Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-10,103
Nursery stock distributor; duties.

A nursery stock distributor shall:

(1) Comply with the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act and the rules
and regulations:

(a) In the care of nursery stock;

(b) In the distribution of nursery stock including nursery stock that
has been withdrawn from distribution;

(c) Regarding treatment or destruction of nursery stock as required
by a withdrawal-from-distribution order;

(d) In maintaining the nursery stock in a manner accessible to the department;
and

(e) In the payment of license fees;

(2) Comply with any order of the director issued pursuant to the act;

(3) Not distribute nursery stock obtained from an unlicensed nursery stock distributor;

(4) Not allow the license to be used by any person other than the person
to whom it was issued; and

(5) Not interfere with the department in the performance of its duties.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 32;

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 22;

Laws 2013, LB68, § 13.